North Dakota, session 69, HB1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 16.1-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Use of artificial intelligence - Disclosure - Exception - Definition .
1. Any action taken for a political purpose, including communication and political advertising in
support of or opposition to a candidate, political committee, or a political party, or for the
purpose of promoting passage or defeat of initiated or referred measures or petitions,
containing images, graphics, videos, audio, text, or other digital content created in whole or in
part with the use of artificial intelligence to visually or audibly impersonate a human,
prominently must state the following disclaimer: "THIS CONTENT GENERATED BY
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE."
2. This section does not apply to content solely using artificial intelligence for text generation,
grammar correction, spelling checks, stylistic editing, or enhancing existing content without
creating a new impersonation of human likeness or voice.
3. For purposes of this section, "artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system capable
of creating images, graphics, videos, audio, text, and other digital content based on human-
defined objectives or data patterns. The term does not include systems that are explicitly
programmed with rules or tools solely designed to assist with grammar, spelling, or word
suggestions without generating human likeness or voice.

H. B. NO. 1167 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1167.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State